Utah statutes.
48-1d-1304.   Providing a professional service.

(1)  Subject to Section 48-1d-1305, a professional services partnership may provide a professional service in this state only through an individual licensed or otherwise authorized in this state to provide the professional service.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not:

(a)  require an individual employed by a professional services partnership to be licensed to perform a service for the professional services company if a license is not otherwise required;

(b)  prohibit a licensed individual from providing a professional service in the individual's professional capacity although the individual is a partner, employee, or agent of a professional services partnership; or

(c)  prohibit an individual licensed in another state from providing a professional service for a professional services partnership in this state if not prohibited by the regulating board.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

